District of Columbia statutes.
42-3637

Mayor’s authority and responsibility.

Expired.

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-139, § 8, 37 DCR 2645

Expiration of Law 8-139

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3631.

1981 Ed., § 45-2559.7.